src/scripts/Macedonian/pg2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This will be applied on the whole sequence of phonemes right after
# the g2p has run on each of the words. So the vowels here will be
# just as they come out of the g2p, and the stress can be changed here
# before the syllabification code uses the stress marks to assign the
# stress to the syllable.

# - will separate the phrases, and the .#. is the usual boundary mark
# - in Foma, which in this case will mean the start and end of the
# - utterance.
define PB %- | .#. ; 

# # will separate the words in the same phrase.
define WB %# | PB ; 

define SpecialWord 
[r a1 b] | # раб 
[a1 d] | # ад
[g a1 z] | #газ 
[l a1 e0 zh] | #лаеж 
[a1 p e0 zh] | #апеж 
[j a1 d e0 zh] | #јадеж 
[k r a1 d e0 zh] | #крадеж 
[b o1 d e0 zh] | #бодеж 
[v ii1 e0 zh] | #виеж 
[v r ii1 e0 zh] | #вриеж 
[k o1 lj e0 zh] | #колеж 
[b a1 k n e0 zh] | #бакнеж 
[r a1 s t e0 zh] | #растеж 
[b e1 g] | #бег 
[b o1 g] | #бог 
[b l o1 g] | #блог 
[s m o1 g] | #смог 
[r o1 g] | #рог 
[b e1 z] | #без 
[f o1 n d] | #фонд 
[k u1 b] | #куб 
[sh e1 v] | #шев 
[k o1 zh u0 v] | #кожув 
[s t r u1 g] | #струг 
[p o0 d] | #под 
[p o1 d] | #под 
[u1 p a0 d] | #упад 
[l u1 d] | #луд 
[j a1 z] | #јаз 
[t e1 g] | #тег 
[s l a1 b] | #слаб 
[k o1 b] | #коб 
[s n o1 b] | #сноб 
[r a1 s p a0 d] | #распад 
[p l o1 d] | #плод 
[l a1 v] | #лав 
[g r a1 v] ; #грав 

define StressVowel 
a0 : a1 | e0 : e1 | ii0 : ii1 | o0 : o1 | u0 : u1 | i0 : i1 | ax0 : ax1 ; 

define Vowel StressVowel.u | StressVowel.l ; 

define fixVowelLetters 
StressVowel -> || PB _ PB ; 

define FixV 
v -> ... ax1 || PB _ PB ; 

define StressSingleMonosyllabicWord 
s e0 @-> ... || PB _ PB ,, 
StressVowel @-> || PB [\[Vowel | %#]]* _ [\[Vowel | %#]]* PB ; 

# Voiced/unvoiced pairs
define VUPair 
b:p|g:k|gj:kj|d:t|dzh:tsh|dz:ts|zh:sh|z:s|v:f;

#Voiced obstruents, extracting the domain of the pair fst.
define VObs VUPair.u;

#Voiceless obstruents, extracting the range of the pair fst.
define UObs VUPair.l | h;

define Obs VObs | UObs ; 

# Unvoiced become voiced before these.
define VContext VObs - v ; 

# Parallel rules with first longest match.
# Special wordds aren't devoiced at all.
#Voice assimilation will take care of their devoicing before a voiceless obstruent.

define FinalDevoicing 
#SpecialWord @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
SpecialWord @-> || WB _ WB ,, 
VUPair @-> || ?+ _ WB ; 


define ObsSeq Obs [[%#]* Obs]* ; 

define Voicing ObsSeq .o. [VUPair.i ->] ; 
define Devoicing ObsSeq .o. [VUPair ->] ; 

define Assimilation 
Voicing [%#]* VContext @-> || _  ,, 
Devoicing [%#]* UObs @-> || _  ; 

define Rules 
fixVowelLetters 
.o. FixV 
.o.  StressSingleMonosyllabicWord 
.o. FinalDevoicing 
.o. Assimilation 
 ; 

regex Rules ; 
